Florida, session 2026, HB6505.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
193
194 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
195 are found and declared to be true.
196 Section 2. The sum of $14,926,639.56 is appropriated from
197 the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and
198 Families for the relief of H.H. for injuries and damages
199 sustained as a result of the department's negligence.
200 Section 3. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6505-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6505 2026
201 a warrant in favor of H.H., payable to an irrevocable trust
202 created for the exclusive use and benefit of H.H., in the sum of
203 $14,926,639.56 upon funds of the Department of Children and
204 Families in the State Treasury and to pay the same out of such
205 funds in the State Treasury.
206 Section 4. It is the intent of the Legislature that all
207 government liens, including Medicaid liens, resulting from the
208 treatment and care of H.H. for the occurrences described in this
209 act be waived and paid by the state.
210 Section 5. The amount paid by the Department of Children
211 and Families pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the
212 amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole
213 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of
214 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in
215 injuries and damages to H.H. The total amount paid for attorney
216 fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the
217 total amount awarded under this act.
218 Section 6. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6505-00